North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-24.1 Medical Assistance for Needy Persons
50-24.1-38.
Health-related services — Licensed emergency medical services personnel. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Medical assistance must cover services provided by community emergency medical services personnel, and other similarly licensed personnel who are licensed or certified under section 23-27-04.3, if the services are provided to an eligible recipient as defined by rule. Community emergency medical services personnel services may include health assessment, chronic disease monitoring and education, immunizations and vaccinations, laboratory specimen collection, followup care, comprehensive health and safety assessment, wound management, assess and report compliance with established care plan, medication management, and other interventions within the scope of practice for each licensure level as approved by a supervising physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse.

The department shall adopt rules governing payments to licensed community emergency medical services personnel, advanced emergency medical technicians, and emergency medical technicians for health-related services provided to recipients of medical assistance, subject to necessary limitations and exclusions. A physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse must supervise any care provided by a licensed community emergency medical services personnel, an advanced emergency medical technician, or an emergency medical technician.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 342, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 207, § 5, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 453, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.1-39.
Behavioral health services — Licensed marriage and family therapists.

Beginning January 1, 2016, the department shall allow licensed marriage and family therapists to enroll and be eligible for payment for behavioral health services provided to recipients of medical assistance, subject to limitations and exclusions the department determines necessary.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 343, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 408, § 38, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

50-24.1-40.
Medical assistance — Tribal health care coordination agreements — Continuing appropriation — Report to legislative management. [Effective through August 31, 2022 — Contingent repeal — See note]

As used in this section:

“Care coordination agreement” means an agreement between a health care provider and tribal health care organization which will result in one hundred percent federal funding for eligible medical assistance provided to an American Indian.

“Tribal health care organization” means Indian health services or a tribal entity providing health care under the federal Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act of 1975 [Pub. L. 93-638; 88 Stat. 2203; 25 U.S.C. 5301 et seq.].

The department of human services shall facilitate care coordination agreements. Of any federal funding received in excess of the state’s regular share of federal medical assistance funding which results from care coordination agreements, the department shall deposit eighty percent in the tribal health care coordination fund and twenty percent in the general fund.

There is created in the state treasury a tribal health care coordination fund.

Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for distribution to a tribal government in accordance with an agreement between the department and a tribal government. The agreement between the department and a tribal government must require the tribe to:

Use the money distributed under this section for purposes related to the ten essential services of public heath identified by the federal centers for disease control and prevention and the development or enhancement of community health representative programs or services; however, through June 30, 2025, no more than fifty percent, and thereafter, no more than thirty-five percent, may be used for capital construction.

Submit to the department annual reports detailing the use of the money distributed under this section.

Submit to the department every two years an audit report, conducted by an independent licensed certified public accountant, of the tribal government use of the money distributed under this section. A tribal government may use money distributed under this section to pay for this audit report. At the discretion of a tribal government, an audit may be conducted more often than every two years.

The distribution of moneys from the fund to a tribal government must be in proportion to the federal funding received from care coordination agreement requests for services originating from within that tribal nation.

At least annually, upon completion of any auditing and verification actions of the department, the department shall distribute moneys from the fund to the tribal government.

If a tribal government fails to file with the department a timely annual report or audit report, the department shall withhold distribution of moneys from the fund to the tribal government until the report is filed.

If an audit report or the department’s review of the annual report finds a tribal government used moneys distributed from the fund for a purpose inconsistent with this section, the department shall withhold future distributions to that tribal government in an amount equal to the money used improperly. The department shall distribute money withheld from a tribal government under this subdivision if a future audit report indicates moneys distributed from the fund are used for purposes consistent with this section.

Before August of each even-numbered year, the department shall compile and summarize the annual reports and audit reports from the participating tribal governments data and provide the legislative management with a biennial report on the fund. Each participating tribe shall compile data and provide the legislative management with a biennial report on the tribe’s use of money distributed from the fund.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 410, § 1, effective May 2, 2019; 2021, ch. 372, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 454, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-40 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.11, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 372, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1407; (contingent repeal) Section 2 of Chapter 372, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1407; and Section 454 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

Section 50-24.1-40 was enacted 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the enactment of Section 1 of Chapter 410, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1194 over Section 1 of Chapter 411, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1515.

Section 4 of chapter 372, S.L. 2021, provides, “

CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Section 2 of this Act becomes effective on January 3, 2023, if the executive director of the department of human services certifies to the secretary of state and to the legislative council that by December 31, 2022, no care coordination agreements have been facilitated under

section 50-24.1-40.”

50-24.1-40.
Medical assistance — Tribal health care coordination agreements — Continuing appropriation — Report to legislative management. [Effective September 1, 2022 — Contingent repeal — See note]

As used in this section:

“Care coordination agreement” means an agreement between a health care provider and tribal health care organization which will result in one hundred percent federal funding for eligible medical assistance provided to an American Indian.

“Tribal health care organization” means Indian health services or a tribal entity providing health care under the federal Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act of 1975 [Pub. L. 93-638; 88 Stat. 2203; 25 U.S.C. 5301 et seq.].

The department shall facilitate care coordination agreements. Of any federal funding received in excess of the state’s regular share of federal medical assistance funding which results from care coordination agreements, the department shall deposit eighty percent in the tribal health care coordination fund and twenty percent in the general fund.

There is created in the state treasury a tribal health care coordination fund.

Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for distribution to a tribal government in accordance with an agreement between the department and a tribal government. The agreement between the department and a tribal government must require the tribe to:

Use the money distributed under this section for purposes related to the ten essential services of public heath identified by the federal centers for disease control and prevention and the development or enhancement of community health representative programs or services; however, through June 30, 2025, no more than fifty percent, and thereafter, no more than thirty-five percent, may be used for capital construction.

Submit to the department annual reports detailing the use of the money distributed under this section.

Submit to the department every two years an audit report, conducted by an independent licensed certified public accountant, of the tribal government use of the money distributed under this section. A tribal government may use money distributed under this section to pay for this audit report. At the discretion of a tribal government, an audit may be conducted more often than every two years.

The distribution of moneys from the fund to a tribal government must be in proportion to the federal funding received from care coordination agreement requests for services originating from within that tribal nation.

At least annually, upon completion of any auditing and verification actions of the department, the department shall distribute moneys from the fund to the tribal government.

If a tribal government fails to file with the department a timely annual report or audit report, the department shall withhold distribution of moneys from the fund to the tribal government until the report is filed.

If an audit report or the department’s review of the annual report finds a tribal government used moneys distributed from the fund for a purpose inconsistent with this section, the department shall withhold future distributions to that tribal government in an amount equal to the money used improperly. The department shall distribute money withheld from a tribal government under this subdivision if a future audit report indicates moneys distributed from the fund are used for purposes consistent with this section.

Before August of each even-numbered year, the department shall compile and summarize the annual reports and audit reports from the participating tribal governments data and provide the legislative management with a biennial report on the fund. Each participating tribe shall compile data and provide the legislative management with a biennial report on the tribe’s use of money distributed from the fund.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 410, § 1, effective May 2, 2019; 2021, ch. 372, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 454, effective September 1, 2022.

50-24.1-41.
Medical assistance benefits — Pregnant women.

The department shall seek the necessary approval from the centers for Medicare and Medicaid services to expand medical assistance coverage for pregnant women with income below one hundred sixty-two percent of the federal poverty level.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 411, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 50-24.1-40 was enacted 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the enactment of Section 1 of Chapter 410, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1194 over Section 1 of Chapter 411, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1515.

Section 2 of chapter 411, S.L. 2019 provides,

“AVAILABILITY DATE.

If the department of human services is able to obtain the necessary approval to expand medical assistance coverage in accordance with section 1 of this Act, the expanded medical assistance coverage for pregnant women becomes available January 1, 2020.”

50-24.1-42.
Automated clearing house payments to medical assistance providers and provider applicants.

The department shall provide payment to medical assistance providers and may provide payments to provider applicants using an automated clearing house to provide for electronic fund transfers. To receive payment, medical assistance providers and provider applicants shall provide sufficient documentation to enable the department to provide electronic funds transfers through an automated clearing house. No other forms of payment are permitted.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 371, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 5 of chapter 371, S.L. 2021, provides, “

APPLICATION.

The department of human services shall stagger implementation of section 3 of this Act so the section applies:

On January 1, 2022, to agreements entered between the department of human services and the individual on or after January 1, 2022; and

On January 1, 2023, to agreements entered between the department of human services and the individual on or before December 31, 2021.”

50-24.1-43.
Medical assistance benefits — Metabolic supplements.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The metabolic supplement has been identified and agreed to be covered through an agreement between the department and the state department of health;

The metabolic supplement has been identified and agreed to be covered through an agreement between the department and the state department of health..

The metabolic supplement is part of a standard recommendation for treatment;

A suitable metabolic supplement that is a covered outpatient drug is not available;

The individual is under nineteen years of age; and

Payment is made at a rate determined by the department.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 373, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

50-24.1-43.
Medical assistance benefits — Metabolic supplements.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Medical assistance coverage must include coverage of a metabolic supplement if:

The metabolic supplement has been identified and agreed to be covered by the department.

The metabolic supplement is part of a standard recommendation for treatment;

A suitable metabolic supplement that is a covered outpatient drug is not available;

The individual is under nineteen years of age; and

Payment is made at a rate determined by the department.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 373, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

50-24.1-44.
Interpreter services.

Medical assistance coverage, including Medicaid expansion, must include payment for sign and oral language interpreter services for assistance in providing covered health care services to a recipient of medical assistance who has limited English proficiency or who has hearing loss and uses interpreting services. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 12, § 34, effective July 1, 2021.